Hawaii statutes.
§145-9 Complaints and investigations.
The department of agriculture may receive verified complaints from any producer
against any commission merchant, dealer, broker, agent, processor, or retail
merchant or any person assuming or attempting to act as such and upon receipt
of the verified complaint may make any and all necessary investigations
relative to the complaint. In conducting any investigation, the department or
its authorized agent may examine any ledgers, books, accounts, memoranda, and
other documents, farm produce, scales, measures, and any other articles and
things used in connection with the business of the person of whom the complaint
has been made. [L 1951, c 74, pt of §1; RL 1955, §23-9; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1,
§22; am L 1961, c 132, §2; HRS §145-9]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next